Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2004.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Emergency SNAP Benefits Plan Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516 "Secretary." The Secretary of the Budget of the Commonwealth."SNAP benefits." Supplemental nutrition assistance provided to a household for the purchase of eligible food.Section 3. Transfer.(a) Department.--The secretary, in consultation with the department, shall weekly certify to the State Treasurer the amount of funds necessary to offset the lack of SNAP benefits money from the Federal Government to facilitate the payment of SNAP benefits to recipients in this Commonwealth.(b) Emergency SNAP Benefits Restricted Account.--Upon receipt of the certification under subsection (a), the State Treasurer shall transfer from the interest in the Budget Stabilization Fund the amount certified to a restricted account, which is hereby established and shall be known as the Emergency SNAP Benefits Restricted Account, in the State Treasury. The money in the Emergency SNAP Benefits Restricted Account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of providing funding to facilitate the payment of SNAP benefits to recipients in this Commonwealth.(c) Transfer.--Upon receipt of any money from the Federal government for the purpose of providing funding to facilitate the payment of SNAP benefits to recipients in this Commonwealth from November 1, 2025, until the Federal Government enacts a budget, the money shall be deposited into the Emergency SNAP Benefits Restricted Account and shall be transferred to the Budget Stabilization Fund within 15 days from deposit.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to be a loan or to be a loan for which interest needs to be repaid to the State 20250HB2004PN2554 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Treasury.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2004PN2554 - 3 - 123